test/src/morphology/V-harinwma66_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - harinõma1: # Verb (66) harinõma1 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     harinõma+V+Inf/mA: harinõma
     harinõma+V+Inf: haridaq
     harinõma+V+ActPrtPrc: harinuq
     harinõma+V+PssPrtPrc: harit
     harinõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: harinõ
     harinõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: harinõs
     harinõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: harisi
     harinõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: harisi
